Utah statutes.
53A-1a-507.1.    Charter school innovative practices -- Report to State Charter School Board.

Prior to July 31 of each year, a charter school may identify and report to the State Charter School Board its innovative practices which fulfill the purposes of charter schools as outlined in Section 53A-1a-503, including:

(1)  unique learning opportunities providing increased choice in education;

(2)  new public school models;

(3)  innovative teaching practices;

(4)  opportunities for educators to actively participate in the design and implementation of the learning program;

(5)  new forms of accountability emphasizing the measurement of learning outcomes and the creation of new measurement tools;

(6)  opportunities for greater parental involvement, including involvement in management decisions; and

(7)  the impact of the innovative practices on student achievement.

